Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12.1 Uniform Partnership Act [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Article 1 General Provisions [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-12.1-101.
Short title. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Uniform Partnership Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-102.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this chapter:

“Business” includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

“Contribution”, except in the phrase “right of contribution”, means property or a benefit described in §

7-12.1-403

which is provided by a person to a partnership to become a partner or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Delivering/delivered” means either physically transferring a paper document to the secretary of state or transferring a document to the secretary of state by electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a person on account of a transferable interest or in a person’s capacity as a partner. The term:

Includes:

A redemption or other purchase by a partnership of a transferable interest; and

A transfer to a partner in return for the partner’s relinquishment of any right to participate as a partner in the management or conduct of the partnership’s business or have access to records or other information concerning the partnership’s business; and

Does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past service or payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other bona fide benefits program.

“Electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.

“Foreign limited liability partnership” means a foreign partnership whose partners have limited liability for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign partnership under a provision similar to §

7-12.1-306(c)

.

“Foreign partnership” means an unincorporated entity formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state which would be a partnership if formed under the law of this state. The term includes a foreign limited liability partnership.

“Jurisdiction”, used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the jurisdiction whose law governs the internal affairs of an entity.

“Limited liability partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited liability partnership” and in Article 11 of this chapter, means a partnership that has filed a statement of qualification under §

7-12.1-901

and does not have a similar statement in effect in any other jurisdiction.

“Partner” means a person that:

Has become a partner in a partnership under §

7-12.1-402

or was a partner in a partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter under §

7-12.1-110

; and

Has not dissociated as a partner under §

7-12.1-601

.

“Partnership”, except in Article 11 of this chapter, means an association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under this chapter or that becomes subject to this chapter under Article 11 of this chapter or §

7-12.1-110

. The term includes a limited liability partnership.

“Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether or not referred to as a partnership agreement and whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination thereof, of all the partners of a partnership concerning the matters described in §

7-12.1-105

. The term includes the agreement as amended or restated.

“Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

“Person” means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, general cooperative association, limited cooperative association, unincorporated nonprofit association, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership, whether or not the office is located in this state.

“Property” means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

“Record”, used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered agent” means an agent of a limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership which is authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the partnership.

“Registered foreign limited liability partnership” means a foreign limited liability partnership that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a statement of registration filed with the secretary of state.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“Signature” or “signed” or “executed” means an original signature, facsimile, or an electronically transmitted signature submitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Transfer” includes:

An assignment;

A conveyance;

A sale;

A lease;

An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

A gift; and

A transfer by operation of law.

“Transferable interest” means the right, as initially owned by a person in the person’s capacity as a partner, to receive distributions from a partnership, whether or not the person remains a partner or continues to own any part of the right. The term applies to any fraction of the interest, by whomever owned.

“Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-103.
Knowledge; Notice. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person knows a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it; or

Is deemed to know it under subsection (d)(1) of this section or law other than this chapter.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (d)(2) of this section.

Subject to §

7-12.1-117(f)

, a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

A person not a partner is deemed:

To know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in §

7-12.1-303(g)

; and

To have notice of:

A person’s dissociation as a partner ninety (90) days after a statement of dissociation under §

7-12.1-704

becomes effective; and

A partnership’s:

Dissolution ninety (90) days after a statement of dissolution under §

7-12.1-802

becomes effective;

Termination ninety (90) days after a statement of termination under §

7-12.1-802

becomes effective; and

Participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication, ninety (90) days after articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Article 11 of this chapter become effective.

A partner’s knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge of or notice to the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-104.
Governing law. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The internal affairs of a partnership and the liability of a partner as a partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership are governed by:

In the case of a limited liability partnership, the law of this state; and

In the case of a partnership that is not a limited liability partnership, the law of the jurisdiction in which the partnership has its principal office.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-105.
Partnership agreement; Scope, Function, and Limitations. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the partnership agreement governs:

Relations among the partners as partners and between the partners and the partnership;

The business of the partnership and the conduct of that business; and

The means and conditions for amending the partnership agreement.

To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for a matter described in subsection (a) of this section, this chapter governs the matter.

A partnership agreement may not:

Vary the law applicable under §

7-12.1-104(1)

;

Vary the provisions of §

7-12.1-110

;

Vary the provisions of §

7-12.1-307

;

Unreasonably restrict the duties and rights under §

7-12.1-408

, but the partnership agreement may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under that section and may define appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restriction on use;

Alter or eliminate the duty of loyalty or the duty of care, except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section;

Eliminate the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under §

7-12.1-409(d)

, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards, if not manifestly unreasonable, by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured;

Unreasonably restrict the right of a person to maintain an action under §

7-12.1-410(b)

;

Relieve or exonerate a person from liability for conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law;

Vary the power of a person to dissociate as a partner under §

7-12.1-602(a)

, except to require that the notice under §

7-12.1-601(1)

to be in a record;

Vary the grounds for expulsion specified in §

7-12.1-601(5)

;

Vary the causes of dissolution specified in §

7-12.1-801(4)

or (5);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership’s business as specified in §

7-12.1-802(a)

, (b)(1), and (d);

Vary the right of a partner under §

7-12.1-901(f)

to vote on or consent to a cancellation of a statement of qualification;

Vary the right of a partner to approve a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under §

7-12.1-1123(a)(2)

,

7-12.1-1133(a)(2)

,

7-12.1-1143(a)(2)

, or

7-12.1-1153(a)(2)

;

Vary the required contents of a plan of merger under §

7-12.1-1122(a)

, plan of interest exchange under §

7-12.1-1132(a)

, plan of conversion under §

7-12.1-1142(a)

, or plan of domestication under §

7-12.1-1152(a)

;

Vary any requirement, procedure, or other provision of this chapter pertaining to:

Registered agents; or

The secretary of state, including provisions pertaining to records authorized or required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter; or

Except as otherwise provided in §§

7-12.1-106

and

7-12.1-107(b)

, restrict the rights under this chapter of a person other than a partner.

Subject to subsection (c)(8) of this section, without limiting other terms that may be included in a partnership agreement, the following rules apply:

The partnership agreement may:

Specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts; and

Alter the prohibition in §

7-12.1-406(a)(2)

to the extent the prohibition requires only that the partnership’s total assets not be less than the sum of its total liabilities.

To the extent the partnership agreement expressly relieves a partner of a responsibility that the partner would otherwise have under this chapter and imposes the responsibility on one or more other partners, the agreement also may eliminate or limit any fiduciary duty of the partner relieved of the responsibility which would have pertained to the responsibility.

If not manifestly unreasonable, the partnership agreement may:

Alter or eliminate the aspects of the duty of loyalty stated in §

7-12.1-409(b)

;

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

Alter the duty of care, but may not authorize conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law; and

Alter or eliminate any other fiduciary duty.

The court shall decide as a matter of law whether a term of a partnership agreement is manifestly unreasonable under subsection (c)(6) or (d)(3) of this section. The Providence County superior court:

Shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the partnership agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

May invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes and business of the partnership, it is readily apparent that:

The objective of the term is unreasonable; or

The term is an unreasonable means to achieve the term’s objective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-106.
Partnership agreement — Effect on partnership and person becoming partner — Preformation agreement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the agreement.

A person that becomes a partner is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

Two (2) or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-107.
Partnership agreement — Effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the agreement or the satisfaction of a condition. An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a partnership and its partners to a person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner are governed by the partnership agreement. Subject only to a court order issued under §

7-12.1-504(b)(2)

to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the partnership agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or is dissociated as a partner:

Is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership or its partners to the person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner; and

Is not effective to the extent the amendment:

Imposes a new debt, obligation, or other liability on the transferee or person dissociated as a partner; or

Prejudices the rights under §

7-12.1-701

of a person that dissociated as a partner before the amendment was made.

If a record delivered by a partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and contains a provision that would be ineffective under §

7-12.1-105(c)

or (d)(3) if contained in the partnership agreement, the provision is ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a record delivered by a partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and conflicts with a provision of the partnership agreement:

The agreement prevails as to partners, persons dissociated as partners, and transferees; and

The record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-108.
Signing of records to be delivered for filing to secretary of state. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A record filed with the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, a record signed by a partnership must be signed by a person authorized by the partnership.

A record filed on behalf of a dissolved partnership that has no partner must be signed by the person winding up the partnership’s business under §

7-12.1-802(c)

or a person appointed under §

7-12.1-802(d)

to wind up the business.

A statement of denial by a person under §

7-12.1-304

must be signed by that person.

Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by that person.

A record filed under this chapter may be signed by an agent. Whenever this chapter requires a particular individual to sign a record and the individual is deceased or incompetent, the record may be signed by a legal representative of the individual.

A person that signs a record as an agent or legal representative affirms as a fact that the person is authorized to sign the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-109.
Liability for inaccurate information in filed record. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter and filed by the secretary of state contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a partner if:

The record was delivered for filing on behalf of the partnership; and

The partner knew or had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the partner reasonably could have:

Effected an amendment under §

7-12.1-901(f)

;

Filed a petition under §

7-12.1-112

; or

Filed with the secretary of state a statement of change under §

7-12.1-909

or a statement of correction under §

7-12.1-116

.

To the extent the partnership agreement expressly relieves a partner of responsibility for maintaining the accuracy of information contained in records delivered on behalf of the partnership to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and imposes that responsibility on one or more other partners, the liability stated in subsection (a)(2) of this section applies to those other partners and not to the partner that the partnership agreement relieves of the responsibility.

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter affirms under penalty of perjury that the information stated in the record is accurate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-110.
Application to existing relationships. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter governs only:

A partnership formed on or after January 1, 2023; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a partnership formed before January 1, 2023, which elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, on and after January 1, 2023, this chapter governs all partnerships.

With respect to a partnership that elects pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section to be subject to this chapter, after the election takes effect the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties apply to:

A third party that had not done business with the partnership in the year before the election took effect; and

A third party that had done business with the partnership in the year before the election took effect only if the third party knows or has been notified of the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-110.1.
Election of existing limited liability partnerships. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

With respect to a limited liability partnership that elects pursuant to §

7-12.1-110(a)(2)

to be subject to this chapter, the partnership must deliver to the secretary of state a statement approved in the manner required by §

7-12.1-901(b)

. The statement must contain:

The name of the limited liability partnership;

A statement that the partnership is a limited liability partnership and elects to comply with the provisions of chapter 12.1 of title 7;

A statement that the partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership is perpetual and remains effective, regardless of changes to the partnership, until it is canceled or administratively revoked pursuant to the provisions of chapter 12.1 of title 7;

The name and street address in this state of the partnership’s registered agent.

Prior to the effective date of this chapter outlined in §

7-12.1-110(b)

, a limited liability partnership may renew its registration pursuant to §

7-12-56(e)

. Upon the effective date of this chapter, to maintain its status as a limited liability partnership, the following actions must be taken:

A designation of a registered agent must be recorded with the secretary of state; and

At the time prescribed, the limited liability partnership must file an annual report in accordance with the provisions of §

7-12.1-913

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-111.
Delivery of record. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, mail, conventional commercial practice, and electronic transmission.

Delivery to the secretary of state is effective only when a record is received by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-112.
Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the superior court to order:

The person to sign the record;

The person to deliver the record to the secretary of state for filing; or

The secretary of state to file the record unsigned.

If a petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the partnership or foreign limited liability partnership to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the partnership or foreign partnership a party to the action.

A record filed under subsection (a)(3) of this section is effective without being signed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-113.
Filing requirements. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

To be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, a record must be received by the secretary of state, comply with this chapter, and satisfy the following:

The filing of the record must be required or permitted by this chapter;

The record must be physically delivered in written form unless and to the extent the secretary of state permits electronic delivery of records;

The words in the record must be in English, and numbers must be in Arabic or Roman numerals, but the name of an entity need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals;

The record must be signed by a person authorized or required under this chapter to sign the record; and

The record must state the name and capacity, if any, of each individual who signed it, either on behalf of the individual or the person authorized or required to sign the record, but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

If any law other than this chapter prohibits the disclosure by the secretary of state of information contained in a record filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall file the record if the record otherwise complies with this chapter but may redact the information.

When a record is filed with the secretary of state, any fee required under this chapter and any fee, tax, interest, or penalty required to be paid under this chapter or law other than this chapter must be paid in a manner permitted by the secretary of state or by that law.

The secretary of state may require that a record delivered in written form be accompanied by an identical or conformed copy.

The secretary of state may provide forms for filings required or permitted to be made by this chapter, but, except as otherwise provided in this section, their use is not required.

The secretary of state may require that a cover sheet for a filing be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-114.
Effective date and time. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-115

and subject to §

7-12.1-116(c)

, a record filed under this chapter is effective:

On the date and at the time of its filing by the secretary of state, as provided in §

7-12.1-117(b)

;

On the date of filing and at the time specified in the record as its effective time, if later than the time under subsection (1) of this section;

At a specified delayed effective date and time, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing; or

If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, at one minute past twelve a.m. (12:01 a.m.) on the date specified, which may not be more than ninety (90) days after the date of filing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-115.
Withdrawal of filed record before effectiveness. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in §§

7-12.1-1124

,

7-12.1-1134

,

7-12.1-1144

, and

7-12.1-1154

, a record filed with the secretary of state may be withdrawn before it takes effect by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of withdrawal.

A statement of withdrawal must:

Be signed by each person that signed the record being withdrawn, except as otherwise agreed by those persons;

Identify the record to be withdrawn; and

If signed by fewer than all the persons that signed the record being withdrawn, state that the record is withdrawn in accordance with the agreement of all the persons that signed the record.

On filing by the secretary of state of a statement of withdrawal, the action or transaction evidenced by the original record does not take effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-116.
Correcting filed record. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person on whose behalf a filed record was filed with the secretary of state may correct the record if:

The record at the time of filing was inaccurate;

The record was defectively signed; or

The electronic transmission of the record to the secretary of state was defective.

To correct a filed record, a person on whose behalf the record was delivered to the secretary of state must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

May not state a delayed effective date;

Must be signed by the person correcting the filed record;

Must identify the filed record to be corrected;

Must specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

Must correct the inaccuracy or defect.

A statement of correction is effective as of the effective date of the filed record that it corrects except for purposes of §

7-12.1-103(d)

and as to persons relying on the uncorrected filed record and adversely affected by the correction. For those purposes and as to those persons, the statement of correction is effective when filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-117.
Duty of secretary of state to file — Review of refusal to file — Delivery of record by secretary of state. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state shall file a record filed with the secretary of state which satisfies this chapter. The duty of the secretary of state under this section is ministerial.

When the secretary of state files a record, the secretary of state shall record it as filed on the date and at the time of its delivery. After filing a record, the secretary of state shall deliver to the person that submitted the record a copy of the record with an acknowledgment of the date and time of filing and, in the case of a statement of denial, also to the partnership to which the statement pertains.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record, the secretary of state shall, not later than ten (10) business days after the record is delivered:

Return the record or notify the person that submitted the record of the refusal; and

Provide a brief explanation in a record of the reason for the refusal.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a record, the person that submitted the record may petition the superior court to compel filing of the record. The record and the explanation of the secretary of state of the refusal to file must be attached to the petition. The Providence County superior court may decide the matter in a summary proceeding.

The filing of or refusal to file a record does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the record in whole or in part; or

Create a presumption that the information contained in the record is correct or incorrect.

Except as otherwise provided by §

7-12.1-909

or by law other than this chapter, the secretary of state may deliver any record to a person by delivering it:

In person to the person that submitted it;

To the address of the person’s registered agent;

To the principal office of the person;

To an electronic address the person provides to the secretary of state for delivery; or

By providing, at no cost to the filer, access to a downloadable copy of the record from the secretary of state’s online corporate database.

Notwithstanding that any instrument authorized to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is filed inaccurately, defectively or erroneously executed, sealed or acknowledged, or otherwise defective in any respect, the secretary of state has no liability to any individual for the preclearance for filing, the acceptance for filing or the filing and indexing of such instrument by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-117.1.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing a statement of partnership authority, one hundred dollars ($100);

Filing a statement of amendment or cancellation of partnership authority, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a statement of denial of partnership authority, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a statement of dissociation, ten dollars ($10.00);

Filing an application to reserve a partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a statement of change of registered agent, twenty dollars ($20.00);

Filing a statement of change of name or address only for a registered agent, without fee;

Filing a statement of qualification for a limited liability partnership, one hundred fifty dollars ($150)

Filing a statement of amendment or cancellation of a limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a fictitious business name statement for a limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00)

Filing an application of registration for a foreign limited liability partnership, one hundred fifty dollars ($150);

Filing an amendment to an application of registration for a foreign limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00)

Filing a certificate of withdrawal of registration as a foreign limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing any other document, statement, or report of a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership, except an annual report, ten dollars ($10.00);

An annual report of a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

To withdraw the certificate of revocation of a limited liability partnership, whether domestic or foreign, a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each year or part of the year that has elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of revocation;

For issuing a certificate of good standing/letter of status, twenty dollars ($20.00);

For issuing a certificate of fact, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to a partnership or limited liability partnership, a fee of fifteen cents ($.15) per page and ten dollars ($10.00) for the certificate and affirming the seal to it;

Service of process on the secretary of state as registered agent of a partnership or a limited liability partnership, fifteen dollars ($15.00) which amount may be recovered as a taxable cost by the party to the suit or action making the service if the party prevails in the suit or action;

Filing articles of merger for a partnership or limited liability partnership, one hundred dollars ($100); and

Filing a statement of domestication for a limited liability partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-118.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The general assembly has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and all limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships subject to this chapter shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-119.
Supplemental principles of law. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-201.
Partnership as entity. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

A partnership is the same entity regardless of whether the partnership has a statement of qualification in effect under §

7-12.1-901

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-202.
Formation of partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit forms a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to form a partnership.

An association formed under a statute other than this chapter, a predecessor statute, or a comparable statute of another jurisdiction is not a partnership under this chapter.

In determining whether a partnership is formed, the following rules apply:

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the co-owners share profits made by the use of the property;

The sharing of gross returns does not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived; and

A person who receives a share of the profits of a business is presumed to be a partner in the business, unless the profits were received in payment:

Of a debt by installments or otherwise;

For services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee;

Of rent;

Of an annuity or other retirement or health benefit to a deceased or retired partner or a beneficiary, representative, or designee of a deceased or retired partner;

Of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral, or rights to income, proceeds, or increase in value derived from the collateral; or

For the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-203.
Partnership property. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Property acquired by a partnership is property of the partnership and not of the partners individually.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.